New Jersey, session 222, S337.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 4 of P.L.1992, c.143 (C.26:2K-57) is amended to read as follows: 4.    The commissioner, in accordance with recommendations adopted by the council, and within the limits of those monies in the fund, shall annually reimburse any private agency, organization or entity which is certified by the commissioner to provide training and testing for certified volunteer members of volunteer ambulance, first aid and rescue [squad personnel] squads, or certified volunteer members of volunteer fire companies who are seeking emergency medical technician-ambulance, or EMT-A, or emergency medical technician-defibrillation, or EMT-D,  certification or recertification, or an entity which provides an educational program in the administration of epinephrine auto-injector devices that is approved by the commissioner pursuant to P.L.2003, c.1 (C.26:2K-47.1 et al.), and for which that entity is not otherwise reimbursed. The priority for reimbursement from the fund to an agency, organization or entity for training and testing of certified volunteer members of volunteer ambulance, first aid and rescue [squad personnel] squads and volunteer fire companies shall be in the following order: EMT-A certification, EMT-A recertification, EMT-D certification, EMT-B certification and EMT-B recertification, EMT-D recertification and certification to administer epinephrine auto-injector devices pursuant to P.L.2003, c.1 (C.26:2K-47.1 et al.). (cf: P.L.2003, c.1, s.9) 2.    Section 5 of P.L.1992, c.143 (C.26:2K-58) is amended to read as follows: 5.    An agency, organization or other entity which receives monies from the fund shall not charge a fee to a person who is certified to be a member of, or an applicant to be a member of, a volunteer ambulance, first aid or rescue squad or a volunteer fire company by the chief supervising officer of that squad or organization. (cf: P.L.1992, c.143, s.5) 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.